New York, session 2025-2026, A351.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 1318 of the real property tax law, 2 as amended by chapter 238 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. The warrant of the collecting officer shall be signed by the trus- 5 tee, or the trustees, or a majority of them, or the board of education 6 or a majority thereof. Such warrant shall state the amount of unexpended 7 surplus funds in the custody of the board and shall further state that 8 except as authorized or required by law, such unexpended surplus funds 9 have been applied in determining the amount of the school tax levy. For 10 the two thousand seven--two thousand eight school year, surplus funds as 11 used in this subdivision shall mean any operating funds in excess of 12 three percent of the current school year budget, and shall not include 13 funds properly retained under other sections of law; provided however, 14 that for the two thousand twenty-six--two thousand twenty-seven school 15 year, the two thousand twenty-seven--two thousand twenty-eight school 16 year, and the two thousand twenty-eight--two thousand twenty-nine school 17 year, surplus funds as used in this subdivision shall mean any 18 operating funds in excess of five percent of the current school year 19 budget, and shall not include funds properly retained under other 20 sections of law. For the two thousand eight--two thousand nine school 21 year, and thereafter, surplus funds as used in this subdivision shall 22 mean any operating funds in excess of four percent of the current school 23 year budget, and shall not include funds properly retained under other 24 sections of law. Such warrant shall have the same force and effect as a 25 warrant issued by a board of supervisors to a collecting officer in a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00848-01-5 A. 351 2 1 town. The collecting officer to whom it may be delivered for collection 2 shall be thereby authorized and required to collect from every person 3 named on such school tax roll the sum set opposite [his] such person's 4 name, or the amount due from any person specified therein, in the same 5 manner and with the same powers that collecting officers in towns are 6 authorized to collect taxes levied by the board of supervisors. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.